Massachusetts, session 194th, S2706.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of section 165 of chapter 112 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clause (3) and inserting
in place thereof the following clause:-
(3) demonstrates to the board, the successful completion of a masters degree in a
relevant field from an educational institution licensed by the state in which it is located and
meets national standards for granting of a masters degree with a subspecialization in marriage
and family therapy, rehabilitation counseling, counseling, or a relevant subspecialization
approved by the board; provided, however, that all relevant graduate coursework credits, as
determined by the board, that an individual earns that count towards the credit requirement for
professional licensure as specialized instructional support personnel, which is inclusive of school
counselors, school social workers, adjustment counselors, and school psychologists, by the
department of elementary and secondary education shall be applied towards this educational
requirement for applicants seeking licensure as a mental health counselor, including credits
earned in a graduate program that is less than 60 credits. To be eligible for licensure, an applicant
of 3

must have 2 additional years of supervised clinical experience in the relevant field in: (i) either a
clinic or hospital licensed by the department of mental health or accredited by the Joint
Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals or in an equivalent center or institute; (ii) in a school
setting as a specialized instructional support personnel licensed by the department of elementary
and secondary education; or (iii) under the direction of a supervisor approved by the board.
Provided further, that any applicant seeking licensure as a mental health counselor who applies
graduate coursework or clinical experience as specialized instructional support personnel
licensed by the department of elementary and secondary education shall also demonstrate
completion of evidence-based training in suicide prevention or intervention. Such training may
be completed as part of a graduate program, professional development, or continuing education
approved by the board. For purposes of this clause, “Supervision” shall be defined as no less than
200 hours of supervised clinical experience, including experience as a specialized instructional
support personnel licensed by the department of elementary and secondary education, at least
100 hours of which shall consist of individual supervision with a clinician who has expertise in
marriage and family therapy, rehabilitation counseling, school counseling, educational
psychology, social work, or counseling and who holds a masters degree in social work, marriage
and family therapy, rehabilitation counseling, educational psychology, counseling or an
equivalent field or holds a doctorate degree in psychology, or a medical degree with a
subspecialization in psychiatry; provided, however, that experience as specialized instructional
support personnel shall only apply towards the supervised experience requirement for applicants
who are seeking licensure as a mental health counselor;
SECTION 2. Said section 165 of said chapter 112, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “section”, in line 30, the following words:- provided,
of 3

however, that a school counselor shall be qualified to sit for the written or oral examination for
licensure as a mental health counselor.
of 3